Tennessee statutes. Title 58 Military Affairs, Emergencies and Civil Defense
Chapter 3

Veterans' Rights in General

58-3-101. Privileges extended to World War II veterans.

All privileges, rights and immunities now extended by law to honorably discharged veterans of World War I are extended to honorably discharged veterans of World War II in as full and complete a manner as though such veterans of World War II had been specifically named in each and every statute granting such privileges, rights and immunities to veterans of World War I.

“Honorably discharged veterans of World War II” includes any person who performed active service, as distinguished from service in the reserve, between November 1, 1940 and the termination of World War II in the United States army, United States air forces, United States navy, United States marine corps, United States coast guard, army nurse corps, merchant marine, and specifically includes females in active service in any auxiliary, attached to and under the discipline of any of the above organizations. The privileges extended to World War II veterans shall also include all the civilian groups assimilated as veterans under the federal code by § 401 of Public Law 95-202, the GI Bill Improvement Act of 1977.

Acts 1945, ch. 13, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 1012.33 (Williams, § 1012.36); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-1001; Acts 1990, ch. 985, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1990, ch. 985, § 2 provided that the amendment by that act is for the purpose of clarifying state law to make state law consistent with federal law, and will not incur any expenses to the state in addition to that which the groups provided for under § 401 of Public Law 95-202, the GI Bill Improvement Act of 1977, are already entitled under state law.

The GI Bill Improvement Act of 1977 is codified in 38 U.S.C. § 101 et seq.

Cross-References. Diplomas for World War II veterans, § 49-2-119.

Contracts with federal agencies for instruction of veterans, § 49-50-401.

Department and commissioner of veterans services, creation, §§ 4-3-101, 4-3-111, 4-3-2503.

Discharges, registration by county register without charge, § 66-24-101.

Motor vehicle registration plates free, disabled veterans, § 55-4-256.

Preference for veterans, § 8-30-307.

Reemployment rights of public employees in military service, §§ 8-33-101 — 8-33-108.

Retirement system, creditable service, title 8, ch. 34, part 6; §§ 8-36-103, 8-36-105.

Teachers' military leave of absence, § 49-5-702.

Law Reviews.

Suddenly Discharged the Combat Continues: Eliminating the Legal Services Gap to Ensure Veterans' Success After Leaving Military Service, 45 U. Mem. L. Rev. 837 (2015).

The Credibility Trap: Notes on a VA Evidentiary Standard, 45 U. Mem. L. Rev. 887 (2015).

58-3-102. Substitution of military service for occupational experience.

The lack of experience in terms of days, weeks, months or years shall not be a barrier to any honorably discharged veteran of World War II seeking to qualify for any position, trade, profession or vocation; provided, that such veteran was engaged in the profession, trade, position or occupation prior to entry into the service; provided further, that the time in days, weeks, months or years spent in the service plus the time previously spent at such trade, profession, vocation or occupation equals the experience required for such trade, position or occupation; and provided further, that such veteran possesses all other necessary qualifications for such trade, position or occupation.

This section shall not apply to any profession requiring great skill and technical knowledge except in cases where the veteran can present satisfactory evidence from the veteran's service record that the veteran was engaged in such profession while in service for a period of time which meets the necessary experience qualifications.

Acts 1947, ch. 186, §§ 1, 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 1012.34 (Williams, § 1012.37); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-1002.

58-3-103. Removal of disability of minor veterans and spouses.

The disability of minority is removed from all minors who serve with the armed forces of the United States so far as the same is necessary to enable such minors to enter into any and all contracts contemplated and authorized by any legislation, state or federal, granting rights, benefits or privileges to honorably discharged veterans. This removal of such disability shall likewise extend and apply to all contracts necessarily implied and arising out of their acceptance of such benefits, rights or privileges, likewise whenever under the laws of this state, the joinder of the spouse of any such minor in the execution of any instrument shall be necessary to its enforceability and if such spouse be likewise a minor, the disability shall also be removed to the extent necessary to allow the valid and enforceable execution of such instrument by such spouse, including the execution of all warranty deeds, trust deeds and all other instruments directly or incidentally connected with such benefits, but not further or otherwise.

Acts 1945, ch. 26, § 1; 1947, ch. 195, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 1012.32 (Williams, § 1012.35); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-1003.

Law Reviews.

Statutory Construction — Substitution of Words (1947), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 151.

58-3-104. Information furnished to veterans.

The department of veterans services shall collect all necessary data and information regarding facilities and services available to veterans, their families and dependents, and shall cooperate with all information or service agencies throughout the state in informing such persons regarding the existence or availability of all educational, training and retraining facilities; health, medical, rehabilitation and housing services and facilities; employment and reemployment services; federal, state and local laws affording rights, privileges and benefits to veterans, their families and dependents, and all other matters of similar, related or appropriate nature.

Acts 1945, ch. 40, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 1012.9 (Williams, § 1012.11); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 6; Acts 1975, ch. 249, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-1006; Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

58-3-105. Assistance in obtaining benefits.

It shall likewise be the duty of the department of veterans services to assist veterans, their families and dependents in the presentation, proof and establishment of all claims, privileges, rights and other benefits which they may have under federal, state or local laws, and to cooperate with all national, state and local government and private agencies securing services or any benefits to veterans, their families and dependents.

Acts 1945, ch. 40, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 1012.10 (Williams, § 1012.12); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 6; Acts 1975, ch. 249, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-1007; Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Military, § 10.

58-3-106. Branch offices and field services.

The commissioner of veterans services shall establish at some place in each congressional district in this state, a branch office in charge of an assistant commissioner or service officer, and such assistant commissioner or service officer may at least once a month visit the county seat of each county within the assistant commissioner's or service officer's congressional district for the purpose of conferring with and assisting veterans in obtaining the benefits granted to them by this or any other statute of this state or of the United States. In addition thereto, such assistant commissioner or service officer shall actively cooperate with any and all veterans' organizations in each county in the assistant commissioner's or service officer's congressional district in the preparation and presentation of claims on behalf of veterans, and should any county or city or combination thereof provide a service officer to aid honorably discharged veterans, such assistant commissioner or service officer shall likewise actively cooperate with them and shall cooperate with any local organization on questions of placement of veterans in the local employment. Such service officers shall be appointed by the commissioner, with the approval of the governor, and where possible, shall be honorably discharged veterans of some war in which the United States was a participant and shall be as well qualified for the duties imposed on them herein as possible.

The commissioner, from time to time, shall issue instructions, manuals of procedure and other bulletins to such assistant commissioners or service officers for the purpose of familiarizing them with their duties and of rendering them more efficient in the performance thereof. Such assistant commissioners or service officers shall not discriminate for or against any veterans' organization in the performance of any duties and no veteran shall be required to join any veterans' organization as a condition precedent to obtaining cooperation hereunder.

Such service officers or assistant commissioners shall be paid such compensation as may be fixed by the commissioner, upon the approval of the governor, which compensation shall be uniform in all cases so far as possible but in addition thereto, they shall be allowed their necessary traveling expenses when on duty outside the county in which their office is located. Annually, before setting the compensation to be paid to service officers or assistant commissioners, the commissioner shall conduct a survey of the compensation paid to service officers in other states. The commissioner shall consider the results of the survey in setting the compensation of service officers or assistant commissioners.

The commissioner is authorized to rent suitable quarters at some point in each congressional district, if the same cannot be procured otherwise in public buildings, as an office for such assistant commissioner or service officer and may employ in connection therewith as well as in connection with the principal office, such clerical assistance as may be found necessary, all with the approval of the governor, the salaries to be paid to be commensurate with those paid for like services in other departments of the state.

The commissioner may likewise incur such other expenses as may be necessary for the administration of §§ 58-3-104 — 58-3-108, all of the same to be within the appropriation made for the department.

In addition, the commissioner may upon the approval of the governor, establish additional offices in any congressional district where the commissioner finds that one (1) assistant commissioner or service officer is incapable of efficiently handling the volume of work placed upon the commissioner by §§ 58-3-104 — 58-3-108.

For purposes of this section, “congressional district” means a congressional district established based upon the 1990 federal census.

Acts 1945, ch. 40, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 1012.12 (Williams, § 1012.14); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 249, §§ 1-3; Acts 1975, ch. 249, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-1008; Acts 2004, ch. 553, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 748, § 1; 2015, ch. 24, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

58-3-107. Oaths administered by department employees.

The commissioner of veterans services and the assistant commissioners or service officers herein provided shall be authorized to take acknowledgements and administer oaths and affirmations and perform such other notarial acts as may be required in the presentation of claims hereunder, including all affidavits, affirmations and acknowledgements directly or by necessary implication falling within the purview of §§ 58-3-104 — 58-3-108, but not further or otherwise. The commissioner likewise is authorized to designate in writing to be filed with the secretary of state, such additional employees of the department as the commissioner may desire to perform such notarial functions, which writing in case of an employee in the central office shall be filed with the secretary of state, and if in a branch office, shall be filed with the county clerk of the county in which such branch office is located. Any false statement made on oath or affirmation before any of such persons shall subject the offender to punishment for perjury under the penalties now provided by law.

Acts 1945, ch. 40, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 1012.13 (Williams, § 1012.16); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 249, §§ 1-3; Acts 1975, ch. 249, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-1009; Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

Cross-References. Perjury, title 39, ch. 16, part 7.

58-3-108. Acceptance of aid by department.

The department of veterans services is authorized to accept services and facilities from any source, public or private, granted in aid and furtherance of the objectives of the department; provided, that no obligation of the department or the state is incurred thereby.

Acts 1945, ch. 40, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 1012.14 (Williams, § 1012.17); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 6; Acts 1975, ch. 249, § 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-1010; Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

58-3-109. County and municipal service offices.

The county legislative bodies of the several counties of this state and the governing bodies of each municipal corporation in this state are authorized, jointly or severally, to establish service offices for the purpose of advising veterans of the United States armed forces, and their dependents, of all rights, privileges, immunities and benefits to which they may be entitled under any law, state or federal, and which may be made available to them by private institutions, organizations or individuals and of assisting them in every way possible in obtaining such rights, immunities and benefits. The service offices shall be staffed by accredited veterans' service officers.

Such service offices may be established by joint contract of a county and a municipal corporation; of two (2) or more counties or by contract between one (1) or more counties and one (1) or more municipalities or two (2) or more municipalities.

Acts 1945, ch. 38, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1012.15 (Williams, § 1012.18); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-1011; Acts 2004, ch. 664, §§ 1-3.

58-3-110. Appropriations for local service offices.

The several county legislative bodies of the counties of this state and the several governing bodies of incorporated municipalities in this state are authorized to appropriate such funds as may be deemed necessary for the operation of such service offices; provided, however, that where such offices be established by appropriate agreement as hereinabove provided, the necessary funds for the operation thereof may be appropriated by the several political subdivisions participating therein in such proportion as may be agreed upon between themselves.

The senior accredited officer serving in a county veterans' service office may receive compensation commensurate to the compensation paid to heads of county government departments of comparable size in the county in which the officer is employed. Such compensation may be prorated to reflect the number of hours that the officer actually works during a specific pay period.

Staff personnel employed by the respective veterans' service offices may receive compensation commensurate to the compensation paid to county government employees in comparable positions.

Acts 1945, ch. 38, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 1012.16 (Williams, § 1012.19); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-1012; Acts 2004, ch. 664, § 4.

58-3-111. Director of local service office.

A veterans' service officer shall be chosen by the governing body or bodies of the political subdivision or subdivisions creating the veterans' service office by which the officer is to be employed.

If a veterans' service office is created by contract between two (2) or more political subdivisions, the veterans' service officer shall be approved by the governing body of each subdivision participating in the establishment of the office. If the political subdivisions are unable to agree upon a veterans' service officer, then the officer shall be chosen by the commissioner of veterans services from among the candidates proposed by the political subdivisions.

All veterans' service officers shall be honorably discharged veterans of the United States armed forces. Veterans' service officers shall have the authority to administer oaths and to take acknowledgments related to any matter falling within the scope of authority of their office, including the presentation of claims and other functions incident to obtaining benefits for discharged veterans. No veteran or dependent of a veteran shall be charged any fee for services rendered by a veterans' service officer.

All veterans' service officers shall successfully complete training and be issued accreditation by the department of veterans services within one (1) year from the date of appointment. Any veterans' service officer who does not complete the required training and receive accreditation within one (1) year of appointment shall be removed from office by the governing body or bodies of the political subdivisions creating the veterans' service office by which the officer is employed.

Acts 1945, ch. 38, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 1012.17 (Williams, § 1012.20); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 249, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-1013; Acts 1991, ch. 21, § 1; 2004, ch. 664, § 5; 2015, ch. 24, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

Attorney General Opinions. To qualify as an “honorably discharged veteran of some war in which the United States has participated,” within the meaning of T.C.A. § 58-3-111(c), an individual must have served on active duty in the military, naval, or air service during a period of war as defined under federal law, and the wars that qualify include the Spanish American War, the Mexican border period, World War I, World War II, the Korean conflict (now Korean War), the Vietnam era, and the Persian Gulf War, OAG 02-083 (7/29/02).

58-3-112. Free admission to state parks one day a year.

In order to honor the veterans of this state and encourage the use of natural parks across Tennessee, the division of parks and recreation shall designate one (1) day per year during which access to and use of all state parks, including, but not limited to, campgrounds and golf courses, shall be free of charge for all veterans. Each veteran shall be required to show proof of veteran status, which may include, but is not limited to, a DD Form 214 or other comparable certificate of discharge from the armed forces, prior to being granted free admission to any state park.

Acts 2010, ch. 807, § 1.

58-3-113. Tennessee Fallen Heroes Medal.

A Tennessee Fallen Heroes Medal may be awarded on behalf of the people of this state to an individual serving on active duty who has been killed in action, while:

Engaged in an action against an enemy of the United States;

Engaged in military support operations involving conflict with an opposing foreign force;

Serving with friendly foreign forces engaged in an armed conflict against an opposing armed force in which the United States is not a belligerent party; or

Serving in a combat zone as designated by presidential order.

A Tennessee Fallen Heroes Medal may be awarded on behalf of the people of this state to an individual serving on active duty who has been killed in an attack that specifically targets military service members or is carried out by an individual inspired or directed by a foreign terrorist organization.

The recipient's name shall be entered on the medal's case of the Tennessee Fallen Heroes Medal recipient.

Individuals eligible to receive the Tennessee Fallen Heroes Medal include all active duty military who are legal residents of this state or stationed in this state.

The Tennessee Fallen Heroes Medal shall be awarded solely by the governor of this state or the governor's designee to the immediate survivor of the recipient.

Acts 2011, ch. 403, § 1; 2012, ch. 655, § 1; 2016, ch. 581, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. House Joint Resolution 239, effective May 17, 1979, provided: “That there is hereby created the ‘Tennessee Distinguished Service Medal’ to be awarded to those Tennesseans who give unselfishly of their time and energies in service to their country and state.”

58-3-114. Suicide prevention training.

The department of veterans services shall provide training in suicide prevention to the employees of the department who directly interact with veterans. The training provided pursuant to this section must equip employees with the ability to recognize the warning signs of a potential suicide. The department may utilize resources from nonprofit organizations to provide the training required by this section.

Acts 2020, ch. 531, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 531, § 2. January 1, 2021.